Utah statutes.
20A-11-508.   Political party reporting requirements -- Criminal penalties -- Fines.

(1) (a)  Each registered political party that fails to file a financial statement by the deadline is subject to a fine imposed in accordance with Section 20A-11-1005.

(b)  Each registered political party that fails to file the interim reports due before the regular primary election, on August 31, or before the regular general election is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (1)(b) to the attorney general.

(2)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of a summary report required by this part, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed report to ensure that:

(a)  each political party that is required to file a report has filed one; and

(b)  each report contains the information required by this part.

(3)  If it appears that any political party has failed to file a report required by law, if it appears that a filed report does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any report, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the political party of the violation or written complaint and direct the political party to file a summary report correcting the problem.

(4) (a)  It is unlawful for any political party to fail to file or amend a summary report within seven days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section.

(b)  Each political party who violates Subsection (4)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (4)(a) to the attorney general.

(d)  In addition to the criminal penalty described in Subsection (4)(b), the lieutenant governor shall impose a civil fine of $1,000 against a political party that violates Subsection (4)(a).



Amended by Chapter 252, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 420, 2013 General Session

